Tennessee, session 114, HB0679.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 29-13-118(d), is amended by
deleting "one thousand dollars ($1,000)" and substituting "two thousand five hundred dollars
($2,500)".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-6-113, is amended by deleting
subsection (e) and substituting:
(e)
(1) The bureau shall perform serology or DNA analysis on a sexual
assault evidence collection kit within one hundred twenty (120) days of the
bureau's receipt of the sexual assault evidence collection kit from a law
enforcement agency.
(2)
(A) If the bureau is unable to perform serology or DNA analysis
on a sexual assault evidence collection kit within one hundred twenty
(120) days pursuant to subdivision (e)(1), then the bureau shall flag the
sexual assault evidence collection kit in the electronic tracking system
and provide the submitting law enforcement agency with a written
explanation for the delay in analysis.
(B) A sexual assault evidence collection kit that has been flagged
pursuant to subdivision (e)(2)(A) must be analyzed within a reasonable
time thereafter.
HB0679
002697
- 1 -

(3) As used in this section, "sexual assault evidence collection kit" has
the same meaning as defined in § 39-13-519.
(4) The bureau's inability to perform serology or DNA analysis on a
sexual assault evidence collection kit within the timeframe required by
subdivision (e)(1) does not limit the admissibility of evidence obtained from the
sexual assault evidence collection kit and is not a ground for challenging the
validity of any analysis performed by the bureau of evidence obtained from the
sexual assault evidence collection kit.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it. Section 1
of this act applies to claims for compensation for forensic medical examinations performed on or
after July 1, 2025. Section 2 of this act applies to sexual assault evidence collection kits
received by the Tennessee bureau of investigation on or after July 1, 2025.
- 2 - 002697